Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-3415
Committee; research or development; limitation on authority.

The Poultry and Egg Development, Utilization, and Marketing Committee shall not be authorized to set up research or development units or agencies of its own, but shall limit its activity to cooperation and contracts with the University of Nebraska Institute of Agriculture and Natural Resources and other proper local, state, regional, or national organizations, public or private, in carrying out the purposes of sections 2-3401 to 2-3416.

Laws 1976, LB 514, § 15.
December 31, 2027